Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3305
Approved veterinary technician program, defined.

Approved veterinary technician program means:

(1) One approved by the board;

(2) A school or college that offers the degree of Veterinary Technician, a degree in veterinary technology, or the equivalent; and

(3) One that conforms to the standards required for accreditation by the American Veterinary Medical Association.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1087.